Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202686-1076
Immunity.

The commission, local governing bodies, and public safety agencies may provide wireless 911 service. In contracting for and providing such service, except for failure to use reasonable care or for intentional acts, the commission, each local governing body, each public safety agency, each wireless carrier, and their employees and agents shall be immune from liability or the payment of damages in the performance of installing, maintaining, or providing wireless 911 service.

Laws 2001, LB 585, § 13;

R.S.Supp.,2001, § 86-2213;

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 269;

R.S.1943, (2024), § 86-468;

Laws 2025, LB362, § 58.